Idaho, session 2025, H0320.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 7, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 7
TRANSPARENCY IN LEGISLATIVE TRAVEL
74-701. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature to
promote public confidence in government and to promote transparency by re-
quiring elected legislators and candidates for legislative office to report
travel paid for by others.
74-702. REPORTING OF PAID TRAVEL -- PENALTY. (1) All legislative can-
didates who will appear on a general election ballot, members of the Idaho
legislature, and members-elect of the Idaho legislature who have prevailed
in their legislative race after the general election shall report to the sec-
retary of state all travel outside of Idaho reasonably related to a legisla-
tive or governmental purpose or to an issue of state, national, or interna-
tional public policy paid for by another individual or entity. Travel paid
through campaign funds that are reported pursuant to chapter 66, title 67,
Idaho Code, or solely through personal funds of a candidate, member, or mem-
ber-elect shall not be subject to the requirements of this section.
(2) Within thirty (30) days of any travel subject to the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section, a candidate, member, or member-elect who is
subject to the reporting requirements provided for in subsection (1) of this
section shall file a report with the secretary of state that shall include:
(a) The travel destination;
(b) The dates of travel;
(c) The purpose of the travel;
(d) The cost of the travel; and
(e) The name and address of the person or entity that paid for the
travel, including whether the travel was a campaign contribution and,
in the case of members of the legislature, whether the travel was made in
such member's official capacity as a legislator.
(3) Any candidate, member, or member-elect who fails to file the report
required pursuant to subsection (2) of this section within thirty (30) days


shall be subject to a late fee in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00)
each day until the report is filed, which fee shall be deposited in the public
school income fund.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.